Utah statutes.
39-4-1.   Governor authorized to organize Utah State Defense Force.

(1)  The governor may organize and maintain within this state, under regulations the United States may prescribe for discipline in training, military forces the governor considers necessary to defend this state.

(2)  These forces shall be composed of officers commissioned or assigned, and able-bodied citizens of the state who volunteer for service, supplemented if necessary by persons in the militia enrolled by draft or otherwise as provided by law.

(3)  These forces shall be additional to and distinct from the National Guard and shall be known as the Utah State Defense Force.  These forces may be uniformed.

